Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2208
Illustrations of benefits payable under variable annuity contracts; conditions.

Illustrations of benefits payable under any variable annuity contract shall not involve projections of past investment experience into the future, nor shall they attempt predictions of future investment experience.

Laws 1969, c. 358, § 8, p. 1263.